Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Penalties

118A.990.
Penalty.

Any person who violates any
of the provisions of this chapter or who fails to perform his duties in the
manner specified in this chapter shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 54, § 29, effective March 10, 1976.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Class A misdemeanor, fines, KRS

534.040

.

Class A misdemeanor, term of imprisonment,
KRS

532.090

.